New Jersey, session 222, A2674.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 4 of P.L.1992, c.67 (C.52:31-37) is amended to read as follows: 4. a. There is established the State Capitol Joint Management Commission to consist of four members of the executive branch of State government and [four] eight members of the legislative branch of State government, as follows:  the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, the General Services Administrator, and two other members of the executive branch of State government to be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor; [four] eight members of the legislative branch of State government who may either be legislators or employees, two of whom shall be appointed by the President of the Senate, [one of whom shall be of a different political party than the President of the Senate, and ] two of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the General Assembly, [one of whom shall be of a different political party than the Speaker of the General Assembly] two of whom shall be appointed by the Senate Minority Leader, and two of whom shall be appointed by the Assembly Minority Leader.  Each appointed member of the legislative branch shall serve during the two-year legislative term in which the appointment is made.  All initial appointments shall be made within 30 days after the effective date of this act.  Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. b. The four members of the commission from the executive branch shall be non-voting members of the commission and constitute a subcommittee on executive branch facility management and the [four] eight members of the commission from the legislative branch shall constitute a subcommittee on legislative branch facility management. (cf: P.L.1992, c.67, s.4) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT The State Capitol Joint Management Commission was created to maintain the House Complex, consisting of the State House and the State House Annex.  The complex is home to the New Jersey Legislature and all its members and employees. Executive officials, because of the COVID-19 pandemic and ongoing construction to the State House, have not utilized the House Complex to the same extent as the Legislature.  In order to more appropriately balance decision-making authority regarding management and maintenance of the House Complex, this bill changes the composition of the commission. This bill increases the legislative representation in the commission, with two members each being appointed by the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the General Assembly, the Minority Leader of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the General Assembly. Additionally, the executive members of the commission, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, the General Services Administrator and two members appointed by the Governor, will become non-voting members of the commission.